District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.15

Liability for creditor claims and statutory allowances.

A beneficiary of a transfer on death deed is liable for an allowed claim against the transferor’s probate estate and statutory allowances to a surviving spouse and children to the extent provided in § 19-601.02.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606